Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-140] Misconduct of a prisoner.
Any person subject to this chapter who, while in the hands of the enemy in time
of war:

(1) For the purpose of securing favorable treatment
by the person's captors acts without proper authority in a manner contrary to
law, custom, or rule, to the detriment of others of whatever nationality held
by the enemy as civilian or military prisoners; or

(2) While in a position of authority over such
persons maltreats them without justifiable cause;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct. [L
1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next